Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.035

Board of accountancy—Members—Terms—Vacancies—Removal.

(1) There is created a board of accountancy for the state of Washington to be known as the Washington state board of accountancy. Effective June 30, 2001, the board shall consist of nine members appointed by the governor. Members of the board shall include six persons who have been licensed in this state continuously for the previous ten years. Three members shall be public members qualified to judge whether the qualifications, activities, and professional practice of those regulated under this chapter conform with standards to protect the public interest, including one public member qualified to represent the interests of clients of individuals and firms licensed under this chapter.

(2) The members of the board shall be appointed by the governor to a term of three years. Vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. Upon the expiration of a member's term of office, the member shall continue to serve until a successor has been appointed and has assumed office. The governor shall remove from the board any member whose license to practice has been revoked or suspended and may, after hearing, remove any member of the board for neglect of duty or other just cause. No person who has served three successive complete terms is eligible for reappointment. Appointment to fill an unexpired term is not considered a complete term. In order to stagger their terms, of the two new appointments made to the board upon June 11, 1992, the first appointed member shall serve a term of two years initially.

[ 2004 c 159 s 1; 2001 c 294 s 3; 1992 c 103 s 3; 1986 c 295 s 2; 1983 c 234 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 294: See note following RCW 18.04.015.